Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 67

Sports Authorities Act of 1993

7-67-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Sports Authorities Act of 1993.”

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 1.

Cross-References. Local option revenue act, allocation of receipts, §67-6-701.

Sales and use taxes, allocation of receipts, §67-6-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Legality of stadium and relocation agreement, OAG 96-011, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 10 (2/6/96).

7-67-102. Legislative findings — Purpose of chapter — Liberal construction.

It is hereby found and determined that:

There is an immediate need to promote and further develop recreational opportunities in this state, by facilitating and equipping the acquisition, construction, and rehabilitation of sports complexes, stadiums, arenas and other recreational facilities, for the holding of professional and amateur athletic events;

The development of such facilities will provide a means to attract and locate major professional team franchises in the state, enhance the state's image as a sports center, and encourage and foster economic development and prosperity;

An authority is needed in individual communities to prepare comprehensive, long-range master plans for the orderly development of sports and recreational facilities and to promote sports and sports-related activities; and

In many instances, effective cooperation between various units of government has been hampered because of inadequate statutory authority.

It is the purpose of this chapter to address these findings by providing for the establishment of sports authorities to plan, promote, finance, construct, acquire, renovate, equip and enlarge buildings, sports complexes, stadiums, arenas, structures and facilities for public participation and enjoyment of professional and amateur sports, fitness, health and recreational activities. The primary purpose of any and all such facilities shall be the conduct of sports events, but use of these facilities need not be limited to those events.

This chapter shall be liberally construed in conformity with its purpose.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 2.

7-67-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Authority” or “sports authority” means any public corporation organized pursuant to this chapter;

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means bonds, notes, interim certificates or other obligations of an authority issued pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to any other law, as supplemented by, or in conjunction with, this chapter;

“Contracting party” or “other contracting party” means any party, including a municipality, to a sale contract, lease agreement or loan agreement, other than the authority;

“Cost”, as applied to any sports and recreational facility, means and includes the cost of acquisition or construction, the cost of labor, materials, and equipment, the cost of all lands, property rights, easements and franchises required; financing charges, interest and debt service prior to and during construction and up to one (1) year thereafter; costs of plans and specifications, services and estimates of costs and of revenues; costs of engineering and legal services; all expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of such acquisitions or constructions; and administrative, legal and engineering expenses and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the acquisition or construction or the financing authorized in this chapter;

“Governing body” means the body in which the general legislative powers of a municipality are vested, and in the case of counties means the legislative body of any county;

“Loan agreement” means an agreement providing for an authority to loan the proceeds derived from the issuance of revenue bonds pursuant to this chapter to one (1) or more contracting parties to be used to pay the cost of one (1) or more projects and providing for the repayment of such loan by the other contracting party or parties, and which may provide for such loans to be secured by or evidenced by one (1) or more notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the contracting party or parties, delivered to the authority or to a trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued;

“Municipality” means any county, metropolitan government or incorporated city or town in this state with respect to which an authority may be organized;

“Project” means any building, sports complex, stadium, arena, sports and recreational facility, or any other structure or facility constructed, leased, equipped, renovated or acquired for any of the purposes set forth in this chapter, and also includes, but is not limited to, roads, streets, highways, curbs, bridges, flood control facilities, and utility services, such as water, sanitary sewer, electricity, gas and natural gas, and telecommunications that are constructed, leased, equipped, renovated or acquired as a supporting system or facility for any of the purposes set forth in this chapter; provided, that such supporting system or facility is dedicated for public use;

“Revenues” of a project means all revenues derived from and on account of a project, directly or indirectly, including payments under a lease or sale contract and repayments under a loan agreement, or under notes, debentures, bonds and other secured or unsecured debt obligations of a lessee or contracting party delivered as provided in this chapter, and any revenues pledged by a municipality;

“Sale contract” means a contract providing for the sale of one (1) or more projects to one (1) or more contracting parties and includes a contract providing for payment of the purchase price in one (1) or more installments. If the sale contract permits title to the project to pass to the other contracting party or parties prior to payment in full of the entire purchase price, it shall also provide for the other contracting party or parties to deliver to the authority or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued one (1) or more notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of such contracting party or parties providing for timely payments, including, but not limited to, interest on notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations for the balance of the purchase price, at or prior to the passage of such title;

“Sports and recreational facilities” means and includes facilities for any and all types of sports and recreational pursuits, including, but not limited to, football, basketball, baseball, soccer, track and field meets, swimming and diving meets, and any and all other sports, games, events or exhibitions that add to the recreational enrichment of the community; and

“State” means the state of Tennessee and, unless otherwise indicated by the context, any agency, authority, branch, bureau, commission, corporation, department or instrumentality of the state, now or hereafter existing.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 3; 1999, ch. 18, § 3.

7-67-104. Application for incorporation to governing body of municipality.

Any number of natural persons, not fewer than three (3), each of whom are duly qualified voters of the municipality, may file with the governing body of the municipality an application in writing seeking permission to apply for the incorporation of a sports authority of such municipality. If the governing body, by appropriate resolution duly adopted, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the authority be formed, authorizes the persons making such application to proceed to form such authority and approves the form of corporate charter proposed to be used in organizing the authority, then the persons making such application shall execute, acknowledge and file a charter for the authority as provided in §7-67-106. No authority may be formed unless such application has first been filed with the governing body of the municipality and the governing body has adopted a resolution as provided in this section.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 4.

7-67-105. Charter contents.

The charter shall set forth:

The names and residences of the applicants, together with a recital that each of them is a voter in the municipality;

The name of the authority, which shall be the sports authority of the city, or county, of , where the blank is to be filled in with the name of the city or county, if such name is available for use by the authority, and if not available, then the incorporators shall designate some other similar name that is available;

A recital that permission to organize the authority has been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the municipality and the date of the adoption of such resolution;

The location of the principal office of the authority;

The purposes for which the authority is proposed to be organized;

The number of directors of the authority;

The period, which may be perpetual, for the duration of the authority;

A provision addressing conflicts of interest of members of the boards of directors of the sports authority; and

Any other matter that the applicants may choose to insert in the charter that is not inconsistent with this chapter or with the laws of the state.

The charter shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each of the applicants.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Methods for dissolution of county sports authority, OAG 96-128, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 156 (11/12/96).

7-67-106. Filing of charter.

When executed and acknowledged in conformity with §7-67-105, the charter shall be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall examine the charter and, if the secretary of state finds that the recitals contained in the charter are correct, that the requirements of §7-67-104 have been complied with, and that the name is not identical with or so nearly similar to that of another authority already in existence in this state as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall approve the charter and accept it for filing. When such charter has been so made, filed and approved, the authority shall constitute a public corporation under the name set out in the charter.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 6.

7-67-107. Amendment of charter.

The charter may, at any time and from time to time, be amended in a manner not inconsistent with §7-67-105. Any such amendment shall be adopted in the following manner: the board of directors of the authority shall file with the governing body of the municipality with which the application for the creation of the authority was filed an application in writing seeking permission to amend the charter, setting forth the proposed amendment to be made. If that sovereign body, by appropriate resolution, finds and determines that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the proposed amendment be made and authorizes the amendment to be made, approving the form of the proposed amendment, then the chair of the board of directors of the authority shall execute an instrument embodying the amendment, and shall file the amendment with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds that the requirements of this section have been complied with, the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and accept it for filing in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office. When such amendment has been so made, filed and approved, it shall become effective.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 7.

7-67-108. Board of directors — Officers — Meetings public.

The authority shall have a board of directors in which all corporate powers of the authority shall be vested. The board shall consist of no fewer than seven (7) directors, all of whom shall be duly qualified voters of the municipality. A director shall serve without compensation, except that the authority may reimburse a director for actual expenses incurred in the performance of a director's duties. A director may not be an elected official or employee of the municipality. The governing body of the municipality shall appoint the directors. The directors shall have staggered terms.

When the initial board of directors is appointed, the governing body of the municipality shall divide the directors into three (3) groups containing substantially equal numbers. The initial term of the directors included in the first group shall be two (2) years; the initial term of the directors included in the second group shall be four (4) years; the initial term of the directors included in the third group shall be six (6) years. All subsequent terms of directors shall be six (6) years; provided, that if at the expiration of any term of office of any director a successor has not been appointed, the director whose term of office has expired shall continue to hold office until the director's successor is appointed.

In the case of authorities created pursuant to the approval of two (2) or more municipalities acting jointly, as provided in § 7-67-120, the number of directors appointed by the governing body of each municipality shall be as nearly equal as practicable.

In counties having a metropolitan form of government, there shall be no more than thirteen (13) directors. Nine (9) of such members of the board of directors shall be appointed based on residency, with at least one (1) director being appointed from each metropolitan public school district. Of the remaining four (4) members, one (1) director shall be a resident of each of the four (4) state senatorial districts. This subdivision (a)(4)(A) shall not affect the terms of the current members of the sports authority board of directors, but appointments shall be made for the new positions created by this subdivision (a)(4)(A), so as to meet the residency requirements established in this subdivision (a)(4)(A), as terms expire and vacancies occur.

In counties having a metropolitan form of government and in municipalities having a population of more than six hundred thousand (600,000) or not less than forty-seven thousand three hundred (47,300) nor more than fifty thousand (50,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the chief executive officer shall appoint the directors. The governing body of the metropolitan government or of such municipality shall by resolution confirm the appointments of the chief executive officer. When the chief executive officer makes the initial appointments, the chief executive officer shall designate which directors serve an initial term of two (2), four (4) and six (6) years, respectively. At least one (1) director shall be a female and at least one (1) director shall be of a racial minority.

If a vacancy occurs in the position of director, the vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as the original term for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect one (1) of its members as chair, one (1) as vice chair, one (1) as secretary, and one (1) as treasurer, and such offices shall annually be filled in like manner. The duties of secretary and treasurer may be performed by the same director. In the event of the resignation or death of the chair, vice chair, secretary or treasurer, another member may be elected to fill the vacancy for the anticipated term of the chair, vice chair, secretary or treasurer.

Any meeting of the board of directors for any purpose whatsoever shall be open to the public. Any action taken by the directors under this chapter may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The concurring vote of a majority of the directors voting at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be necessary for the exercise of any of the powers granted by this chapter.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 8; 1995, ch. 414, § 2; 1996, ch. 741, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 953, § 1; 1997, ch. 382, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-67-109. Powers of the authority.

Each sports authority created pursuant to this chapter shall be a public nonprofit corporation and a public instrumentality of the municipality with respect to which the authority is organized. The authority shall have the following powers, together with all powers incidental to the following powers or necessary for the performance of those powers, to:

Have succession by its corporate name for the period specified in the charter, unless sooner dissolved as provided in § 7-67-119;

Sue and be sued and to prosecute and defend, at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

Have and use a corporate seal and alter the seal at pleasure;

Acquire, whether by purchase, construction, exchange, gift, lease, or otherwise, and to improve, repair, extend, equip, furnish, operate and maintain one (1) or more projects, which projects shall be within at least one (1) of the municipalities with respect to which the authority shall have been created, including all real and personal properties that the board of directors of the authority may deem necessary in connection with the projects and regardless of whether or not any such projects shall then be in existence, and including the power to demolish such existing structures as may be on sites acquired when such structures are not needed for the project;

Operate, maintain, manage, and enter into contracts for the operation, maintenance and management of any project undertaken, and to make rules and regulations with regard to such operation, maintenance and management;

Employ, contract with, fix the compensation of, and discharge engineering, architectural, legal and financial experts, and such consultants, agents and employees, as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter and to provide for the proper construction, operation and maintenance of any project;

Lease, rent and contract for the operation of all or any part of any project for sports and recreational facilities, and charge and collect rent for the project and terminate any such lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations of the lease; and include in or exclude from any such lease provisions that the lessee shall have the option to renew the term of the lease for such period or periods and at such rent as shall be determined by the board of directors;

Lease such space in a project as from time to time may not be needed for sports and recreational purposes to any other person, corporation, partnership or association for such purposes as the board of directors may determine are in the best interest of the authority or will help facilitate the purposes for which the authority was created, and upon such terms and in such manner as the board may determine;

Fix and collect rates, rentals, fees and charges for the use of any and all of the sports and recreational facilities of the authority;

Contract for the operation of concessions on or in any of the sports and recreational facilities of the authority;

Advertise within or without the state any of the sports and recreational facilities of the authority;

Sell, exchange, donate, and convey any or all of its properties, whenever the board of directors shall find any such action to be in furtherance of the purposes for which the authority was organized;

Procure and enter into contracts for any type of insurance or indemnity against loss or damage to property from any cause, including loss of use and occupancy, against death or injury of any person, against employer's liability, against any act of any member, officer or employee of the authority in the performance of the duties of such person's office or employment or any other insurable risk, as the board of directors, in its discretion, may deem necessary;

Accept donations, contributions, revenues, capital grants or gifts from any individuals, associations, public or private corporations, and municipalities, the state or the United States, or any agency or instrumentality of the state or the United States, for or in aid of any of the purposes of this chapter and enter into agreements in connection with the donations, contributions, revenues, capital grants or gifts;

Borrow money from time to time and, in evidence of any obligation incurred, issue and sell its revenue bonds in accordance with this chapter and the applicable provisions of title 9, chapter 21, in such form and upon such terms as its board of directors may determine and as approved by the governing body of the creating municipality, payable out of any revenues of the authority, including grants or contributions or other revenues specifically provided to the authority, for the purpose of acquiring, erecting, extending, improving, equipping, renovating or repairing any project or for any combination of such purposes, and demolishing structures on the project site and acquiring a site or sites necessary and convenient for such project, including, but without in any way limiting the generality of the foregoing, architectural, engineering, legal, consulting and financing expenses, and including an amount sufficient to meet the interest charges on such revenue bonds during such estimated period or periods as may elapse prior to the time when the project or projects may become revenue producing and for one (1) year in addition to the estimated period; refund and refinance, from time to time, revenue bonds so issued and sold, as often as may be deemed to be advantageous by the board of directors; and, pending the issuance of its revenue bonds for the purposes in this chapter authorized, issue its interim certificates or notes or other temporary obligations;

Enter into any agreement or contract with any lessee who, pursuant to the terms of this chapter, is renting or is about to rent from the authority all or part of any building or buildings or facilities, whereby, under such agreement or contract, such lessee obligates itself to pay all or part of the cost of maintaining and operating the premises so leased, and such agreement may be included as a provision of any lease entered into pursuant to the terms of this chapter or may be made the subject of a separate agreement or contract between the authority and such lessee;

Mortgage and pledge as security for the payment of the principal of and interest on any revenue bonds so issued and any agreements made in connection with the bonds, any or all of the projects or any part or parts of the projects, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, and pledge the revenues and receipts from the bonds or from any of the bonds;

Enter into any contract to facilitate the location of a professional sports team in a project located in a metropolitan government or in any county having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, make any payments required under the contract and borrow funds for the purpose of making any such payment as provided in this chapter funded from revenues other than tax revenues;

Exercise all powers expressly given in its charter and establish bylaws and make all rules and regulations not inconsistent with the charter or the provisions of this chapter, deemed expedient for the management of the affairs of the authority; and

Acquire, whether by purchase, construction, exchange, gift, lease or otherwise, and improve, repair, extend, equip, furnish, operate and maintain any roads, streets, highways, curbs, bridges, flood control facilities, utility services such as water, sanitary sewer, electricity, gas and natural gas, and telecommunications that the board of directors of the sports authority deems to be necessary, expedient or advisable in connection with the development or operation of any project; dedicate any such highways, roads or services to the public use; enter into any contract to facilitate these purposes and make any payments required under such contracts; borrow funds for the purpose of making any payment authorized by this subdivision (20); and pledge and otherwise use the revenues of the sports authority to repay such borrowed funds.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 9; 1995, ch. 414, § 1; 1999, ch. 18, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Methods for dissolution of county sports authority, OAG 96-128, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 156 (11/12/96).

7-67-110. Audit.

The board of directors of each authority shall cause an annual audit to be made of the books and records of its authority. The comptroller of the treasury, through the department of audit, shall be responsible for determining that such audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and that such audits meet the minimum standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury.

Such audits shall be prepared by certified public accountants or by the department of audit. In the event the governing body of the authority shall fail or refuse to have the audit prepared, then the comptroller of the treasury may appoint a certified public accountant, or direct the department of audit, to prepare the audit, the cost of such audit to be paid by the authority.

Each authority shall prepare an annual report of its business affairs and transactions. A copy of such report shall be filed with the municipality granting permission to the authority to organize.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 10.

7-67-111. Donations of services and property — Reversion of property to donor.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating with an authority, the municipality authorizing such authority may assign or loan any of its employees, including its engineering staff and facilities, and may provide necessary office space, equipment, and other facilities for the use of such authority, as the governing body of such municipality shall approve.

The governing body of such municipality, entering into a lease of any project, or part or parts of a project, may make donations of property, real or personal, or cash grants to the authority, in such amount or amounts as it may deem proper and appropriate in aiding the authority to accomplish its purpose.

Any municipality authorizing an authority that enters into a lease with an authority may convey real property or personal property to the authority and may include a provision in such conveyance for the reversion of such property to the transferor at such time as all revenue bonds or other obligations of the authority incident to the real property so conveyed shall have been paid in full, and any authority created pursuant to this chapter is authorized to accept such a conveyance.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 11.

7-67-112. Bonds of authority.

All bonds issued by the authority shall be issued in accordance with the applicable provisions of title 9, chapter 21, and shall be payable solely out of the revenue and receipts derived from any projects, or of any portion of projects owned, operated or leased to or from the authority, as may be designated by the board of directors of the authority, when the bonds shall be authorized to be issued or from any revenues to be derived directly or indirectly by the authority from such projects, including revenues from concessions, endorsements, ticket sales and souvenir sales, or from any revenues derived directly or indirectly by the authority from the allocation, transfer, contribution or pledge of tax revenues of any nature by a municipality having taxing power, other than tax revenues derived from ad valorem property taxes that shall not be contributed or pledged by a municipality in payment of or collateral for any revenue bonds of the authority. Such bonds may be issued in one (1) or more series, may be executed and delivered by the authority, at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denomination and of such terms and maturities, may be subject to redemption prior to maturity, either with or without premium, may bear such conversion privileges and be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date of the bonds, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this chapter, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the board of directors whereunder the bonds shall be authorized to be issued.

Bonds of the authority shall be executed in the name of the authority by such officers of the authority and in such manner as the board of directors may direct, and shall be sealed with the corporate seal of the authority. If so provided in the proceedings authorizing the bonds, the facsimile signature of any of the officers executing such bonds and a facsimile of the corporate seal of the authority may appear on the bonds in lieu of the manual signature of such officer and the manual impress of such seal.

Any bonds of the authority may be sold at public or private sale, for such price and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the board of directors of the authority to be most advantageous, and the authority may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions that its board of directors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance of the bonds.

Any bonds of the authority, at any time outstanding, may, at any time and from time to time, be refunded by the authority by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the board of directors may deem necessary, which may include amounts sufficient to refund the principal of the bonds so to be refunded, any unpaid interest necessary or incidental and any premiums, commissions or other expenses or charges. Any such refunding may be effected whether the bonds to be refunded shall have then matured or shall thereafter mature, either by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds of the refunding bonds to the payment of the bonds to be refunded by the refunding bonds, or by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the bonds to be refunded by the refunding bonds, with the consent of the holders of the bonds so to be refunded, and regardless of whether or not the bonds to be refunded were issued in connection with the same projects or separate projects, and regardless of whether or not the bonds proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

Interim certificates or notes or other temporary obligations issued by the authority pending the issuance of its revenue bonds shall be payable out of revenues and receipts in like manner as such revenue bonds and shall be retired from the proceeds of such bonds upon the issuance of the revenue bonds, and shall be in such form and contain such terms, conditions and provisions consistent with this chapter as the board of directors may determine.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this section or any other law to the contrary, a sports authority and the municipality in which it is located may enter into an agreement under which all or any portion of the real property ad valorem taxes paid by the owner of a sports facility shall be paid into a special enterprise fund of the municipality, subject to the conditions set forth in this subdivision (f)(1). The municipality is authorized to use the moneys in such enterprise fund in order to make any payments due to the sports authority from the municipality under a contractual obligation. Such an enterprise fund may only be utilized where the funds paid from the special enterprise fund to the sports authority shall be principally used by the sports authority to make payments on revenue bonds issued by the sports authority, where the net proceeds of such bonds were used by the sports authority to acquire, construct or equip systems, improvements or facilities that are public improvements dedicated for public use, and such improvements were made by the sports authority in order to assist in the development and construction of such sports facility, and the sports authority is authorized to pledge any moneys paid to it from such enterprise fund as collateral for such revenue bonds, notwithstanding § 7-67-113. The agreement between the sports authority and the municipality shall not be effective unless approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

Notwithstanding subdivision (f)(1), if the sports authority is not the owner of the sports and recreational facility, then prior to the issuance of any bonds for a project as defined in § 7-67-103 related to the sports and recreational facility, the sports authority, in addition to the pledge of revenues from the project as the source of payment for such bonds, shall provide further security for the payment of the bonds, such as bond insurance, a surety bond, a letter of credit, a third party guarantee, the contractual obligation of the owner or operator of the sports facility as to its ownership and operation during the term of the bonds, or other similar security, all of which must be submitted to the comptroller of the treasury for approval.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 12; 1999, ch. 18, §§ 4, 5.

7-67-113. Security for bonds.

The principal of and interest on any bonds issued by the authority shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts out of which the principal and interest shall be made payable and may be secured by a pledge of revenues of the authority derived from other sources, such as revenues from other sports and recreational facilities and a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the projects from which the revenues or receipts so pledged may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any such projects thereafter made, or revenues derived directly or indirectly by the authority from tax revenues allocated, transferred, contributed or pledged by a municipality having taxing authority, other than tax revenues derived from ad valorem property taxes that shall not be contributed or pledged by a municipality in payment of or collateral for any revenue bonds of the authority. The proceedings under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the projects covered by the bonds, the fixing and collection of rents for any portions of projects leased by the authority to others, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the board of directors shall deem advisable and not in conflict with this chapter. Each pledge, agreement, or mortgage or deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the authority shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the pledge, agreement, or mortgage or deed of trust were made shall have been fully paid. In the event of default in such payment or in any agreement of the authority made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any mortgage or deed of trust executed as security for the bonds, such payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity or by foreclosure of any such mortgage or deed of trust, or any one (1) or more of such remedies.

The board of directors of any authority issuing bonds under this chapter shall charge, collect and revise, from time to time whenever necessary, rents and charges for the rental of projects or parts of projects, the revenues from which are pledged to the payment of such bonds, sufficient to pay for the operation and maintenance of such projects and such portion of the administrative costs of the authority as may be provided in the lease or leases of such projects, and to pay such bonds and the interest on the bonds as the bonds and interest become due, including such reserves for the bonds and interest as may be determined to be necessary by the board of directors.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 13.

7-67-114. Exemption from taxation — Annual report of leased property.

The authority is hereby declared to be performing a public function on behalf of the municipality with respect to which it is organized and to be a public instrumentality of such municipality. Accordingly, the authority and all properties at any time owned by it and the income from the properties and all bonds issued by the authority and the income from the bonds, shall be exempt from all taxation in the state. Also, for purposes of the Tennessee Securities Act of 1980, compiled in title 48, chapter 1, part 1, bonds issued by the authority shall be deemed to be securities issued by a public instrumentality or a political subdivision of the state.

On or before October 1 each year, any authority lessee or sublessee shall file with the comptroller of the treasury a report listing leased properties and details of the lease and payment in lieu of tax (PILOT) agreements in the format provided in § 7-53-305. A copy of the report shall be filed with the assessor of property on or before October 15. The assessor may audit or review the report and conduct comparative analysis to ensure that all agreements and reports are filed. Failure to timely complete and file the report at the comptroller of the treasury shall subject the lessee or sublessee to a late filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) payable to the comptroller of the treasury. In addition, failure to file the report with the comptroller of the treasury or assessor within thirty (30) days after written demand for the report shall subject the lessee or sublessee to an additional payment in lieu of tax in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500).

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 14; 2008, ch. 1013, § 5; 2016, ch. 588, §§ 3, 4.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment in (b) substituted “comptroller of the treasury” for “state board of equalization” preceding “a report” in the middle of the first sentence; and substituted “comptroller of the treasury” for “board” twice in the fourth sentence and preceding “or assessor” in the middle of the last sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 588, § 7. March 10, 2016.

7-67-115. Nonliability of municipality.

Except to the extent of any revenues that may be specifically allocated, transferred, contributed or pledged by a municipality in accordance with this chapter and laws, rules and regulations applicable to this chapter, no municipality shall in any event be liable for the payment of the principal of or interest on any bonds of the authority or for the performance of any pledge, mortgage, obligation or agreement of any kind whatsoever that may be undertaken by the authority, and none of the bonds of the authority or any of its agreements or obligations shall be construed to constitute an indebtedness of the municipality within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory provision whatsoever.

Acts 1993, ch. 378, § 15.